Maryland, session 2025, HB1173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
7–302.
(e) (4) (i) Except as provided in paragraph (5) of this subsection, from the
fines collected by a political subdivision as a result of violations enforced by speed
monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, stop sign monitoring systems, school
bus monitoring cameras, bus lane monitoring systems, or noise abatement monitoring
systems a political subdivision:
1. May recover the costs of implementing and administering
the speed monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, school bus monitoring
cameras, bus lane monitoring systems, or noise abatement monitoring systems; and

HOUSE BILL 1173 3
2. Subject to subparagraphs (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this
paragraph, may spend any remaining balance solely for public safety purposes, including
pedestrian or highway safety programs.
(ii) 1. For any fiscal year, if the balance remaining from the fines
collected by a political subdivision as a result of violations enforced by speed monitoring
systems, after the costs of implementing and administering the systems are recovered in
accordance with subparagraph (i)1 of this paragraph, is greater than 10% of the total
revenues of the political subdivision for the fiscal year, the political subdivision shall remit
any funds that exceed 10% of the total revenues to the Comptroller.
2. The Comptroller shall deposit any money remitted under
this subparagraph to the General Fund of the State.
(VII) 1. FROM THE FINES COLLECTED BY MONTGOMERY
COUNTY OR BY A MUNICIPAL GOVERNMENT IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY AS A RESULT
OF VIOLATIONS ENFORCED BY SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS PLACED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 21–809(B)(1)(VI)7 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE, ANY
BALANCE REMAINING AFTER THE ALLOCATION OF FINES UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH
(I)1 OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE USED TO FUND THE STUDY, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION OF SAFETY–RELATED PROJECTS ON ROADWAYS OR INTERSECTIONS
IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY THAT HAVE BEEN IDENTIFIED IN THE MUNICIPALITY’S,
COUNTY’S, OR STATE’S MOST RECENT STRATEGIC HIGHWAY SAFETY PLAN OR
VISION ZERO PLAN AS ROADWAYS OR INTERSECTIONS THAT ARE AT HIGH RISK FOR
MOTOR VEHICLE CRASHES THAT RESULT IN SERIOUS BODILY INJURY OR DEATH.
2. FROM THE FINES COLLECTED BY A MUNICIPAL
GOVERNMENT IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY AS A RESULT OF VIOLATIONS ENFORCED
BY SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS PLACED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 21–809(B)(1)(VI)7
OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE, ANY BALANCE REMAINING AFTER THE
ALLOCATION OF FINES UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)1 OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE
USED TO FUND THE STUDY, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION OF SAFETY–RELATED
PROJECTS ON ROADWAYS OR INTERSECTIONS IN THE MUNICIPALITY THAT HAVE
BEEN IDENTIFIED IN THE MUNICIPALITY’S, COUNTY’S, OR STATE’S MOST RECENT
STRATEGIC HIGHWAY SAFETY PLAN, VISION ZERO PLAN, OR SIMILAR ROAD SAFETY
PLAN AS ROADWAYS OR INTERSECTIONS THAT ARE AT HIGH RISK FOR MOTOR
VEHICLE CRASHES THAT RESULT IN SERIOUS BODILY INJURY OR DEATH.
Article – Transportation
21–101.
(a) In this title and Title 25 of this article the following words have the meanings
indicated.

HOUSE BILL 1173
(g) “Controlled access highway” means a highway or roadway to or from which
persons, including the owners or occupants of abutting lands, have no right of access except
at the points and in the manner determined by the public authority with jurisdiction over
the highway or roadway.
(k) “Expressway” means a major highway of 2 or more traffic lanes in each
direction that is designed to eliminate principal traffic hazards and has the following
characteristics:
(1) A median divider separating opposing traffic lanes to eliminate
head–on collisions and sideswiping;
(2) Grade separation structures to eliminate the conflict of cross streams
of traffic at each intersection;
(3) Points of entrance and exit limited to predetermined locations;
(4) Vertical curves long enough to provide long sight distances; and
(5) Shoulders wide enough to permit vehicles to stop or park out of traffic
lanes.
(L–1) “INTERSTATE HIGHWAY” MEANS A STATE HIGHWAY THAT IS PART OF
THE NATIONAL INTERSTATE SYSTEM IN THE STATE, AS DESIGNATED BY THE
ADMINISTRATION AND APPROVED BY THE UNITED STATES SECRETARY OF
TRANSPORTATION UNDER TITLE 23 OF THE UNITED STATES CODE.
21–809.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(8) “Speed monitoring system” means a device with one or more motor
vehicle sensors producing recorded images of motor vehicles traveling at speeds at least 12
miles per hour above the posted speed limit.
(b) (1) (i) A speed monitoring system may not be used in a local jurisdiction
under this section unless its use is authorized by the governing body of the local jurisdiction
by local law enacted after reasonable notice and a public hearing.
(v) An ordinance or resolution adopted by the governing body of a
local jurisdiction under this paragraph shall provide that, if the local jurisdiction moves or
places a mobile or stationary speed monitoring system to or at a location where a speed
monitoring system had not previously been moved or placed, the local jurisdiction may not
issue a citation for a violation recorded by that speed monitoring system:

HOUSE BILL 1173 5
1. Until signage is installed in accordance with
subparagraph (viii) of this paragraph; and
2. For at least the first 15 calendar days after the signage is
installed.
(vi) This section applies to a violation of this subtitle recorded by a
speed monitoring system that meets the requirements of this subsection and has been
placed:
1. In Anne Arundel County, Montgomery County, or Prince
George’s County, on a highway in a residential district, as defined in § 21–101 of this title,
with a maximum posted speed limit of 35 miles per hour, which speed limit was established
using generally accepted traffic engineering practices;
2. In a school zone with a posted speed limit of at least 20
miles per hour;
3. In Prince George’s County:
A. Subject to subparagraph (vii)1 of this paragraph, on
Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway); or
B. On that part of a highway located within the grounds of
an institution of higher education as defined in § 10–101(h) of the Education Article, or
within one–half mile of the grounds of a building or property used by the institution of
higher education where generally accepted traffic and engineering practices indicate that
motor vehicle, pedestrian, or bicycle traffic is substantially generated or influenced by the
institution of higher education;
4. Subject to subparagraph (vii)2 of this paragraph, on
Interstate 83 in Baltimore City;
5. In Anne Arundel County, on Maryland Route 175 (Jessup
Road) between the Maryland Route 175/295 interchange and the Anne Arundel
County–Howard County line; [or]
6. Subject to subparagraph (vii)3 of this paragraph, at the
intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford Road) and Bonfield Avenue in Talbot County;
OR
7. SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (XII) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY ON A HIGHWAY IDENTIFIED IN THE
MUNICIPALITY’S, COUNTY’S, OR STATE’S MOST RECENT STRATEGIC HIGHWAY
SAFETY PLAN OR VISION ZERO PLAN AS A HIGHWAY THAT IS AT HIGH RISK FOR
MOTOR VEHICLE CRASHES THAT RESULT IN SERIOUS BODILY INJURY OR DEATH.

HOUSE BILL 1173
(XII) NEITHER MONTGOMERY COUNTY NOR A MUNICIPAL
GOVERNMENT IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY MAY PLACE, HAVE PLACED, OR USE A
SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM TO ENFORCE SPEED LIMITS IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THIS SECTION ON A CONTROLLED ACCESS HIGHWAY, AN EXPRESSWAY, OR AN
INTERSTATE HIGHWAY IN THE COUNTY.
(c) (1) Unless the driver of the motor vehicle received a citation from a police
officer at the time of the violation, the owner or, in accordance with subsection (f)(4) of this
section, the driver of a motor vehicle is subject to a civil penalty if the motor vehicle is
recorded by a speed monitoring system while being operated in violation of this subtitle.
(2) A civil penalty under this subsection may not exceed $40.
(3) For purposes of this section, the District Court shall prescribe:
(i) A uniform citation form consistent with subsection (d)(1) of this
section and § 7–302 of the Courts Article; and
(ii) A civil penalty, which shall be indicated on the citation, to be paid
by persons who choose to prepay the civil penalty without appearing in District Court.
(L) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2030, AND ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1
EVERY 5 YEARS THEREAFTER, MONTGOMERY COUNTY OR A MUNICIPALITY IN
MONTGOMERY COUNTY SHALL EVALUATE EACH SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM USED
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B)(1)(VI)7 OF THIS SECTION FOR ITS
EFFECTIVENESS IN REDUCING THE MOTOR VEHICLE SPEED AT OR BELOW WHICH
85% OF THE DRIVERS TRAVEL AT THE LOCATION OF THE SPEED MONITORING
SYSTEM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.